Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.110

When review not necessary.

Where an area proposed for annexation is less than ten acres and less than two million dollars in assessed valuation, the chair of the review board may by written statement declare that review by the board is not necessary for the protection of the interest of the various parties, in which case the board shall not review such annexation.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4152; 1987 c 477 s 4; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 42; 1967 c 189 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.